Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB904.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4301 of Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4301. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to [an attestation] a certification of compliance with Federal and State insurance laws regarding mental health and substance use disorder benefits.Section 2. The definitions of "health insurance policy" and "insurer" in section 4302 of Title 40 are amended to read:§ 4302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:["Health insurance policy." As follows:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) An insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services.(2) The term does not include any of the following types of policies:(i) Accident only.(ii) Fixed indemnity.(iii) Credit.(iv) Dental only.(v) Vision only.(vi) Specified disease.(vii) Medicare supplement.(viii) Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement.(ix) Long-term care.(x) Disability income.(xi) Workers' compensation.(xii) Automobile medical payment insurance.]"Insurer." [An entity licensed by the department with accident and health authority to issue a health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).] As follows:(1) An entity that issues or administers health 20250SB0904PN1024 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurance policies or health plans and is subject to the jurisdiction of the department.(2) The term includes an entity organized or existing under, or subject to, any of the following:(i) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(iii) The act of May 18, 1976 (P.L.123, No.54), known as the Individual Accident and Sickness Insurance Minimum Standards Act.(iv) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).* * *Section 3. Section 4303 of Title 40 is amended to read:§ 4303. [Annual attestation.(a) Statement regarding MHPAEA compliance.--For the form for each health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed by an insurer, the insurer shall annually file with the department a statement attesting to the insurer's documented analyses of efforts to comply with MHPAEA and the Federal regulations relating to mental health and substance use disorder parity as of the date of the attestation.(b) Statement regarding MHPAEA nonapplicability.--For the form for each insurance policy offered, issued or renewed by an insurer in this Commonwealth that is required to be filed but to which MHPAEA does not apply, the insurer shall annually file with the department a statement attesting to the 20250SB0904PN1024 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonapplicability of MHPAEA to the policy form.(c) Filing.--Each attestation required under this section must be filed by April 30 of each year or with the form filing, whichever is earlier.] Certification.No later than January 1 of each year, an insurer that issues or administers a health insurance policy or health plan in this Commonwealth, including a policy or plan in which mental health or substance use disorder benefits are managed by an entity other than the insurer, shall file with the department a written certification signed by an officer of the insurer under oath attesting that:(1) The insurer has completed a comprehensive review of all health insurance policies and health plans issued or administered by the insurer, including policies and plans in which mental health or substance use disorder benefits are managed by an entity other than the insurer, for compliance with the requirements of MHPAEA and its implementing regulations and compliance with section 604-B of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, and its implementing regulations.(2) All policies and plans under paragraph (1) comply with the laws and regulations referred to in paragraph (1).Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0904PN1024 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223